District of Columbia statutes.
7-179

Dairy Inspector may act as Inspector of Livestock.

Any Inspector of Dairies and Dairy Farms may act as Inspector of Livestock when directed by the Director of the Department of Human Services.

History

Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 993, ch. 192
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-115.
1973 Ed., § 6-116.

Editor's Notes

Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.